Utah statutes.
75-2-705.   Class gifts construed to accord with intestate succession.
(1)  Adopted individuals and individuals born out of wedlock, and their
respective descendants if appropriate to the class, are included in class
gifts and other terms of relationship in accordance with the rules for
intestate succession.  Terms of relationship that do not differentiate
relationships by blood from those by affinity, such as "uncles," "aunts,"
"nieces," or "nephews," are construed to exclude relatives by affinity.  Terms
of relationship that do not differentiate relationships by the half blood from
those by the whole blood, such as "brothers," "sisters," "nieces," or
"nephews," are construed to include both types of relationships.
(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), in construing a
dispositive provision of a transferor who is not the natural parent, an
individual born to the natural parent is not considered the child of that
parent unless the individual lived while a minor as a regular member of the
household of that natural parent or of that parent's parent, brother, sister,
spouse, or surviving spouse.
(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), in construing a
dispositive provision of a transferor who is not the adopting parent, an
adopted individual is not considered the child of the adopting parent unless
the adopted individual lived while a minor, either before or after the
adoption, as a regular member of the household of the adopting parent.
